South Dakota, session 2026, SB168.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to a NEW CHAPTER in title 26:
Terms used in this chapter mean:
(1) "Age verification," any method by which a deployer confirms that an individual
attempting to engage with an AI-companion, therapy chatbot, or other generative
artificial intelligence possessing human-like features is at least eighteen years of
age, by authenticating a driver license, passport, or other identification card issued
by a state or the federal government, which includes a photograph of the individual
and the individual's date of birth;
(2) "Artificial intelligence," any machine-based system that, for any explicit or implicit
objective, infers from the inputs received by the system how to generate content,
decisions, predictions, recommendations, or other outputs, which can influence
physical or virtual environments;
(3) "AI-generated content," any image, video, audio, multimedia, or text content that
is substantially created or modified by generative artificial intelligence, so that the
use of generative artificial intelligence alters the meaning or significance a
reasonable person would take away from the content;
(4) "AI-companion," a generative artificial intelligence that is designed, optimized, and
marketed to form ongoing social or emotional bonds with a user, regardless of
whether the system also has the ability to provide information, complete tasks, or
assist the user with specific functions;
(5) "Chatbot," a generative artificial intelligence with which a user is able to interact
by approximating or simulating conversation through text, audio, or other
communicative medium;
(6) "Deployer," an individual or entity that operates or distributes a chatbot;
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.252.10 2 168
(7) "Emergency situation," a circumstance in which a user indicates to a therapy
chatbot or other artificial intelligence that the user is a danger to self or others;
(8) "Generative artificial intelligence," an artificial intelligence capable of generating
novel image, video, audio, multimedia, or text content based on prompts or other
forms of data provided by a user;
(9) "Human-like feature," a feature of a generative artificial intelligence capable of:
(a) Behaving in a way that would cause a reasonable individual to believe the
intelligence that created the image, video, audio, multimedia, or text
content is human or possesses sentience, emotions, or desires;
(b) Responding to the prompts or data provided by the user in a way that
simulates the development of an emotional relationship with the user; or
(c) Impersonating any individual, living or dead;
(10) "Therapy chatbot," a chatbot that has been designed or modified in a way that
purports to provide mental health support, counseling, or therapeutic intervention
through the diagnosis, treatment, mitigation, or prevention of a mental health
condition; and
(11) "User," an individual who interacts with an artificial intelligence;
Section 2. That a NEW SECTION be added to a NEW CHAPTER in title 26:
A deployer may not make any chatbot operated or distributed by the deployer
available to be purchased, used, or otherwise engaged by a minor, if the chatbot is
designed, optimized, or marketed as an AI-companion or has been designed or optimized
to include any human-like features. The deployer shall implement an age verification
system on any chatbot marketed as an AI-companion or designed or optimized to include
any human-like features. The deployer may make a version of the chatbot available to a
minor, if the deployer has removed all human-like features from the chatbot.
Section 3. That a NEW SECTION be added to a NEW CHAPTER in title 26:
A deployer shall implement and maintain a system that detects, responds to,
reports, and mitigates an emergency situation, in a manner that prioritizes the safety and
well-being of the user.
Section 4. That a NEW SECTION be added to a NEW CHAPTER in title 26:
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.252.10 3 168
A deployer may collect and store information from a user only if the information is
necessary for the deployer to fulfill a legitimate purpose.
Section 5. That a NEW SECTION be added to a NEW CHAPTER in title 26:
A deployer may make any chatbot operated or distributed by the deployer available
to be purchased, used, or otherwise engaged by a minor, if the chatbot is designed or
optimized to be a therapy chatbot. Before a therapy chatbot may be made available to a
minor, the deployer must ensure that:
(1) The chatbot provides, at the beginning and end of each interaction with the
chatbot, a clear and conspicuous disclaimer that the responses are the product of
a generative artificial-intelligence and not a licensed professional;
(2) The chatbot is not designed or marketed to be a substitute for a licensed
professional;
(3) A licensed mental health professional:
(a) Assesses a user's suitability;
(b) Prescribes the chatbot to the user as part of a comprehensive treatment
plan; and
(c) Monitors the impact of the chatbot on the user;
(4) The developer of the chatbot provides robust, independent, and peer-reviewed
clinical trial data demonstrating the safety and efficacy of the chatbot, when used
under specific conditions; and
(5) The system's functions, limitations, and data privacy policies are transparent to
both the licensed health professional and the user.
Section 6. That a NEW SECTION be added to a NEW CHAPTER in title 26:
Any deployer found in violation of sections 2, 3, 4, or 5 of this Act is subject to an
injunction and liable for a civil penalty in an amount not exceeding five thousand dollars
per incident, per affected minor. The civil penalty may be assessed and recovered only in
a civil action by the attorney general. The attorney general shall forward any civil penalty
collected under this section to the state treasurer for deposit in the general fund.
Before the attorney general may initiate an action pursuant to this section, the
attorney general must provide written notice to the deployer. The attorney general shall
identify, in the notice, the provision that is alleged to have been violated, and the
measures that must be implemented by the deployer to prevent future violations.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.252.10 4 168
If the deployer cures any noticed violation to the satisfaction of the attorney
general, and, within ninety days of the notice, provides the attorney general with a written
statement, signed under oath, indicating that the alleged violation has been cured, the
deployer is not liable for a civil penalty for any cured violation of section 2, 3, 4, or 5 of
this Act.
Nothing in this section may be construed to serve as the basis for a new private
right of action for any violation of section 2, 3, 4, or 5 of this Act.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.